en: rye scalding
da: rugskoldning
sv: rågskållning

en: wheat scalding
da: hvedeskoldning
sv: veteskållning

en: spelt
ar: حنطة
bg: спелта
br: yell
ca: espelta
cs: špalda, pšenice špalda
da: spelt
de: Dinkel, Spelt
el: όλυρα, ντίνκελ, σπέλτα
eo: spelto
es: espelta, escanda
et: speltanisu, spelta
eu: espelta
fa: اسپلت
fi: spelttivehnä, speltti, spelttiä
fr: épeautre
ga: speilt
gl: espelta
he: כוסמין
hr: pravi pir, pirovo, pir, pira, pirove, iz pira
hu: tönkölybúza, tönköly
io: spelto
is: spelt
it: farro spelta, granfarro, spelta
ja: スペルトコムギ
ko: 스펠트밀
la: Triticum aestivum ssp. spelta, Triticum spelta
lb: Spelz
lt: speltos, spelta
lv: speltas kvieši
mk: крупник
ms: spelt
mt: farru, qamħ spelt
nb: spelt
nl: spelt
nn: spelt
oc: espeuta
pl: orkisz, pszenica orkisz, pszenicy orkisz, orkiszu, orkiszowa, orkiszowe, orkiszowy, pszenne orkiszowe
pt: espelta
ro: alac, grâu spelt, alac spelt
ru: спельта
sk: špalda
sl: pira
sr: крупник, krupnik
sv: spelt, speltvete, dinkel, dinkelvete
ta: ஸ்பெல்ட்
tr: kavuzlu buğday
tt: борай
uk: спельта
wa: speate
zh: 斯佩耳特小麦

en: whole spelt
de: Dinkelvollkorn
hr: cijeli pir
it: farro integrale
nl: volkoren spelt

en: sprouted spelt
de: Dinkel-Sprossen, Dinkel Sprossen, Dinkelkeimlinge
hr: proklijala pir
it: farro germogliato
pl: kiełki orkiszu

fr: flocons d'épeautre, flocons blé d'épeautre
de: Dinkelflocken, Dinkelweizenflocken
fi: spelttihiutale
hr: pirove pahuljice
hu: tönkölybúzapehely
it: fiocchi di quinoa
nl: spelttarwevlokken
pl: płatki orkiszowe

en: spelt flakes
da: speltflager
sv: speltflingor, dinkelveteflingor, flingor av dinkelvete

en: whole grain spelt flakes
de: Dinkelvollkornflocken, Dinkelvollkornschrot
fi: täysjyväspelttivehnähiutale
fr: flocons d'épeautre complet
hr: pahuljice od pira u cijelom zrnu
it: fiocchi di farro integrale
pl: płatki orkiszowe pełnoziarniste
sv: fullkornsdinkelveteflingor

en: spelt bran
de: dinkelkleie
fi: spelttilese
hr: mekinje od pira
it: crusca di farro
nl: speltzemelen
sv: dinkelkli

en: inflated spelt
de: Dinkelweizen gepufft, Dinkel gepufft, gepuffter Dinkel, gepuffter Weizendinkel
es: espelta inflada
hr: napuhan pir
it: farro gonfiato

en: spelt groats
hr: krupica od pira
it: semola di farro
pl: kasza orkiszowa, kasza z pszenicy orkisz

en: grünkern
ar: جرونكيرن
cs: Zelená špalda
de: Grünkern
fr: Épeautre vert
hr: zeleni krupnik
it: Farro verde

en: pearled farro
fr: épeautre perlé
hr: biserni farro
it: farro perlato

en: whole spelt kernels
da: fuldkornsspeltkerner
se: fullkornskärnor av dinkelvete

en: spelt flour, spelt wheat flour
bg: брашно от спелта
ca: farina d'espelta, farina de blat d'espelta
cs: špaldová mouka
de: Dinkelmehl, Dinkelweizenmehl
es: harina de espelta, harina de trigo espelta, harina gruesa de espelta
fi: spelttijauho
fr: farine d'épeautre, farine de blé d'épeautre
hr: pirovo brašno, pirovo pšenično brašno
hu: tönkölyliszt
it: farina di spelta, farina di farro spelta
nl: speltmeel, speltbloem, spelttarwemeel
pl: mąka orkiszowa, mąka z pszenicy orkisz
pt: farinha de espelta
sk: múka z pšenice špaldy
sv: speltvetemjöl, dinkelmjöl, dinkelvetemjöl, mjöl av dinkelvete

en: wholemeal spelt flour, whole grain spelt flour, wholegrain spelt flour
bg: пълнозърнесто брашно от спелта
ca: farina de blat d'espelta integral, farina integral de blat d'espelta
cs: celozrnná špaldová mouka, celozrnná mouka z pšenice špaldy
de: Dinkelvollkornmehl, dinkel vollkornmehl, Dinkelweizenvollkornmehl
es: harina de espelta integral, harina integral de espelta, harina integral de trigo de espelta
fi: täysjyväspelttijauho, täysjyväspelttivehnäjauho
fr: farine complète d’épeautre, farine d'épeautre complète, farine d'épeautre complet, farine complète blé d'épeautre
hr: brašno od cjelovitog zrna pira, brašno iz cijelog zrna pira, pirovo brašno od cjelovitog zrna, pirovo pšenično brašno od cjelovitog zrna
hu: teljes kiőrlésű tönkölyliszt
it: farina integrale di spelta
nl: volkoren speltmeel
pl: mąka pełnoziarnista z pszenicy orkisz, mąka z pszenicy orkisz pełnoziarnista
pt: farinha integral de espelta
sv: fullkornsspeltvetemjöl

en: dextrinated spelt flour
de: dextriniertes Dinkelmehl
es: harina de espelta dextrinada
fr: farine d'épeautre dextrinée
hr: dekstrinirano brašno od pira
hu: dextrinált tönkölyliszt
it: farina di farro destrinizzata
nl: gedextrineerd speltmeel

en: spelled krispies
hr: pirovi krispiji
it: farro soffiato

en: khorasan wheat
xx: kamut
bg: камут
de: Kamut
el: σιτηρό kamut
es: kamut, trigo de Jorasán Kamut
fr: blé khorasan, kamut
ga: camut
hr: horasanska pšenica
it: kamut, khorasan kamut
la: Triticum turgidum subsp. turanicum, Triticum turanicum
lt: kamutas
ru: камут

en: khorasan wheat flour, kamut flour
de: Khorasan Weizenmehl
hr: khorasan pšenično brašno
it: farina di kamut